apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
    <pardef n="rar/óg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óg</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oga</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogowi</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oga</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogiem</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogu</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogu</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogi</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og w</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogom</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogami</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogach</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogi</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogi</l>
          <r>óg<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kot/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kowi</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiem</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k w</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="duch/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ew__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wa</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wu</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wa</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wem</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wie</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wie</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wy</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>w w</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wom</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wami</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wach</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wy</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wy</l>
          <r>ew<s n="n"/><s n="m2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="raróg"><i>rar</i><par n="rar/óg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kotek"><i>kot</i><par n="kot/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duch"><i>duch</i><par n="duch/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lew"><i>l</i><par n="l/ew__n"/></e>
